California, session 20252026, AB519.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 122365) is added to Part 6 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 9.5. Prohibition of Animal Sales by Broker122365. For purposes of this chapter, all of the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Animal rescue group” means any not-for-profit organization that has tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose mission and practice is, in whole or significant part, the rescue and placement of animals into permanent homes, and that meets both of the following:(1) Does not breed animals.(2) Does not obtain animals in exchange for payment or compensation from any person that breeds or brokers animals.(b) “Broker” means a person or business that sells, arranges, negotiates, or processes, either in person or online, the sale of dogs, cats, or rabbits bred by another for profit. This includes facilitating the transfer of a dog, cat, or rabbit for profit.(c) “Public animal control agency or shelter” means any facility operated by or under contract with any governmental entity for the purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted dogs, cats, rabbits, or other animals.122365.1. (a) A broker shall not make available for adoption, sell, or offer for sale a dog under one year of age, a cat, or a rabbit.(b) This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:(1) The sale or transfer of an animal conducted by, or on behalf of, the bona fide owner to a new owner, so long as the bona fide owner does not sell or transfer an animal more than three instances per calendar year.(2) The purchase of an animal by, or sale, transfer, or adoption of, an animal to a governmental agency. (3) The transfer of ownership of a guide, signal, or service dog, as defined in Section 54.1 of the Civil Code.(4) Public animal control agency or shelter, or animal rescue group.(5) Nonprofit organizations engaged in youth education related to animal care and rearing.